Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.899

Intent—Periodic review.

The amendments to chapter 43.88 RCW by chapter 215, Laws of 1986 are intended to improve the reporting of state budgeting, accounting, and other fiscal data. The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee shall periodically review chapter 43.88 RCW and shall recommend further revisions if needed.

[ 1986 c 215 s 8.]